Morphological-Analysis/Finnish-05/finnish.lexc
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
Multichar_Symbols

+Noun                ! POS
+Verb                ! POS

!! LEXICON Verb-Inflection-I

+Infinitive-A
+1Person_Singular
+2Person_Singular
+1Person_Plural
+2Person_Plural
+3Person_Plural

!! LEXICON Noun-Inflection-I

+Nominative
+Genitive
+Inessive
+Adessive
+Allative
+Elative
+Ablative
+Essive
+Translative
+Illative

!! %>                        !! morpheme boundary (Apertium)
!! +                         !! morpheme boundary

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
LEXICON Root

Noun-stems ;
Verb-stems ;


!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
LEXICON Verb-Inflection-I

+Infinitive-A:%>a # ;
+1Person_Singular:%>n # ;
+2Person_Singular:%>t # ;
+1Person_Plural:%>mme # ;
+2Person_Plural:%>tte # ;
+3Person_Plural:%>vat # ;


!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
LEXICON Noun-Inflection-I

!! OK too: 
!! +Nominative:    # ; !!                    

+Nominative:%>0    # ; !!                    
+Genitive:%>n    # ; !! of                 
+Inessive:%>ssa  # ; !! in                 
+Adessive:%>lla  # ; !! at                 
+Allative:%>lle  # ; !! onto               
+Elative:%>sta  # ; !! out-of from-within 
+Ablative:%>lta  # ; !! from               
+Essive:%>na   # ; !! as                 
+Translative:%>ksi  # ; !! as-into            
+Illative:%>Vn   # ; !! into               


!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
LEXICON Noun-stems

talo+Noun:talo    Noun-Inflection-I ;   ! (house)
pala+Noun:pala    Noun-Inflection-I ;   ! (piece)
savu+Noun:savu    Noun-Inflection-I ;   ! (smoke)
ovi+Noun:ovI      Noun-Inflection-I ;   ! (door)
katto+Noun:katto  Noun-Inflection-I ;   ! (roof)

isä+Noun:isä      Noun-Inflection-I ;  ! (father)
hissi+Noun:hissi  Noun-Inflection-I ;  ! (lift)
kivi+Noun:kivI    Noun-Inflection-I ;  ! (stone)

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
LEXICON Verb-stems

palaa+Verb:pala      Verb-Inflection-I ;   ! (burn)
ajaa+Verb:aja        Verb-Inflection-I ;   ! (drive)
!! nukkua+Verb:nukku Verb-Inflection-I ;   ! (sleep)

kysyä+Verb:kysy      Verb-Inflection-I ;  ! (ask)
kestää+Verb:kestä    Verb-Inflection-I ;  ! (last)
heittää+Verb:heittä  Verb-Inflection-I ;  ! (berate)
